California statutes. Penal Code
A brief description of all projects eligible for a commitment of council funds shall be made available to the public through a publication of the council having statewide circulation at least 30 days in advance of the meeting at which funds for such project can be committed by vote of the council.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1047.)
-------------------------------------------

13825.

The State Graffiti Clearinghouse is hereby created in the Office of Emergency Services. The State Graffiti Clearinghouse shall do all of the following, subject to federal funding:

(a) Assess and estimate the present costs to state and local agencies for graffiti abatement.

(b) Award grants to state and local agencies that have demonstrated implementation of effective graffiti reduction and abatement programs.

(c) Receive and disburse funds to effectuate the purposes of the clearinghouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 441.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.1. The California Gang, Crime, and Violence Prevention Partnership Program [13825.1. - 13825.6.]

13825.1.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Gang, Crime, and Violence Prevention Partnership Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 885, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

13825.2.

(a) The California Gang, Crime, and Violence Prevention Partnership Program shall be administered by the Department of Justice for the purposes of reducing gang, criminal activity, and youth violence to the extent authorized pursuant to this chapter in communities with a high incidence of gang violence, including, but not limited to, the communities of Fresno, Glendale, Long Beach, Los Angeles, Oakland, Riverside, Santa Ana, Santa Cruz, San Bernardino, San Diego, San Jose, San Francisco, San Mateo, Santa Monica, and Venice. The department shall also consider communities that meet any one of the following criteria:

(1) An at-promise youth
 population, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 13825.4, that is significantly disproportionate to the general youth population of that community.

(2) A juvenile arrest rate that is significantly disproportionate to the general youth population of that community.

(3) Significant juvenile gang problems or a high number of juvenile gang-affiliated acts of violence.

(b) All state and local juvenile detention facilities, including, but not limited to, facilities, juvenile halls, youth ranches, and youth camps of the Division of Juvenile Justice, shall also be considered eligible to receive services through community-based organizations or nonprofit agencies that are operating programs funded under this
 chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 800, Sec. 19.   (AB 413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13825.3.

All funds made available to the Department of Justice for purposes of this chapter shall be disbursed in accordance with this chapter to community-based organizations and nonprofit agencies that comply with the program requirements of Section 13825.4 and the funding criteria of Section 13825.5 of this chapter.

(a) Funds disbursed under this chapter may enhance, but shall not supplant local, state, or federal funds that would, in the absence of the California Gang, Crime, and Violence Prevention Partnership Program, be made available for the prevention or intervention of youth involvement in gangs, crime, or violence.

(b) The applicant community-based organization or nonprofit agency may enter into interagency agreements between it and a fiscal agent that will allow the fiscal agent to manage the funds awarded to the community-based organization or nonprofit agency.

(c) Before April 15, 1998, the department shall prepare and file administrative guidelines and procedures for the California Gang, Crime, and Violence Prevention Partnership Program consistent with this chapter.

(d) Before July 1, 1998, the department shall issue a “request for funding proposal” that informs applicants of the purposes and availability of funds to be awarded under this chapter and solicits proposals from community-based organizations and nonprofit agencies to provide services consistent with this chapter.

(e) The department shall conduct an evaluation of the California Gang, Crime, and Violence Prevention Partnership Program after two years of program operation and each year thereafter, for purposes of identifying the effectiveness and results of the program. The evaluation shall be conducted by staff or an independent body that has experience in evaluating programs operated by community-based organizations or nonprofit agencies.

(f) After two years of program operation, and each year thereafter, the department shall prepare and submit an annual report to the Legislature describing in detail the operation of the program and the results obtained from the California Gang, Crime, and Violence Prevention Partnership Program receiving funds under this chapter. The report shall also list the full costs applicable to the department for processing and reviewing applications, and for administering the California Gang, Crime, and Violence Prevention Partnership Program. The department shall be required to submit an annual report to the Legislature only in years in which the California Gang, Crime, and Violence Prevention Partnership Program receives funds under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 699, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

13825.4.

(a) Community-based organizations and nonprofit agencies that receive funds under this chapter shall utilize the funds to provide services and activities designed to prevent or deter at-promise youth from participating in gangs, criminal activity, or violent behavior.

(b) These prevention and intervention efforts shall include, but not be limited to, any of the following:

(1) Services and activities designed to do any of the following:

(A) Teach alternative methods for resolving conflicts and responding to violence, drugs, and
 crime.

(B) Develop positive and life-affirming attitudes and behaviors.

(C) Build self-esteem.

(2) Recreational, educational, or cultural activities.

(3) Counseling or mentoring services.

(4) Economic development activities.

(c) (1) Funds allocated under this chapter may not be used for services or activities related to suppression, law enforcement, incarceration, or other purposes not related to the prevention and deterrence of gangs, crime, and violence.

(2) Nothing in this section shall prevent funds allocated under this chapter from being used for violence prevention and gang crime deterrence services provided by community-based organizations and nonprofit agencies to youths incarcerated in juvenile detention facilities.

(d) Services and activities provided with funds under this chapter shall be used for at-promise youth who are defined as persons from age 5 to 20 years of age and who fall into one or more of the following categories:

(1) Live in a high-crime or high-violence neighborhood as identified by local or federal law enforcement agencies.

(2) Live in a low-economic neighborhood as identified by the U.S. Census or come from an impoverished family.

(3) Are excessively absent from school or are doing poorly in school as identified by personnel from the youth’s school.

(4) Come from a socially dysfunctional family as identified by local or state social service agencies.

(5) Have had one or more contacts with the police.

(6) Have entered the juvenile justice system.

(7) Are identified by the juvenile justice system as being at risk.

(8) Are current or former gang members.

(9) Have one or more family members living at home who are current
 or former members of a gang.

(10) Are identified as wards of the court, as defined in Section 601 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (f), in carrying out a program of prevention and intervention services and activities with funds received under this chapter, community-based organizations and nonprofit agencies shall do all of the following:

(1) Collaborate with other local community-based organizations, nonprofit agencies or local agencies providing similar services, local schools, local law enforcement agencies, residents and families of the local community, private businesses in the local community, and charitable or religious organizations, for purposes of developing plans to
 provide a program of prevention and intervention services and activities with funds provided under this chapter.

(2) Identify other community-based organizations, nonprofit agencies, local agencies, and charitable or religious organizations in the local community that can serve as a resource in providing services and activities under this chapter.

(3) Follow the public health model approach in developing and carrying out a program to prevent, deter, or reduce youth gangs, crime, or violence by (A) identifying risk factors of the particular population to be targeted, (B) implementing protective factors to prevent or reduce gangs, crime, or violence in the particular community to be serviced, and (C) designing community guidelines for prevention and intervention.

(4) Provide referral services to at-promise youth who are being served under this chapter to appropriate organizations and agencies where the community-based organization or nonprofit agency can readily identify a need for counseling, tutorial, family support, or other types of services.

(5) Provide the parents and family of the at-promise youth with support, information, and services to cope with the problems the at-promise youth, the parents, and the family are confronting.

(6) Involve members of the at-risk target population in the development, coordination, implementation, and evaluation of their program of services and activities.

(7) Objectively evaluate
 the effectiveness of their services and activities to determine changes in attitudes or behaviors of the at-promise youth being served under this chapter towards gangs, crime, and violence.

(f) Providers of programs that operate in juvenile detention facilities shall not be required to meet the criteria specified in
 paragraph (5) of subdivision (e) for those programs offered only in those facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 800, Sec. 20.   (AB 413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13825.5.

To be eligible for funding under this chapter, community-based organizations and nonprofit agencies shall submit a request for funding proposal in compliance with this chapter to conduct a program that meets the requirements of Section 13825.4. The Department of Justice shall establish the minimum standards, funding schedules, and procedures for awarding grants that shall take into consideration, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) A demonstrated showing of at least two years of experience in administering a program providing prevention or prevention and intervention services that have positively affected the attitudes or behaviors of at-promise youth,
 as defined in this chapter, toward gangs, crime, or violence.

(b) New programs, services, or staff that would augment the existing programs, services, and activities already being provided the community-based organization or nonprofit agency.

(c) The size of the eligible at-promise youth population that would be served by the community-based organization or nonprofit agency.

(d) The likelihood that the program will continue to operate after state grant funding ends.

(e) The ability of the community-based organization or nonprofit agency to objectively evaluate itself and a demonstrated showing of its plan to evaluate itself if funds are awarded. For purposes of this
 chapter, community-based organizations and nonprofit agencies do not include libraries, community service organizations, and city, county, and state-operated departments of parks and recreation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 800, Sec. 21.   (AB 413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13825.6.

Funding for the California Gang, Crime, and Violence Prevention Partnership Program shall be subject to the following:

(a) 2 percent of the amounts appropriated in the Budget Act shall be transferred each year upon the approval of the Director of Finance, for expenditure as necessary for the Department of Justice to administer this program.

(b) 3 percent of the amounts appropriated in the Budget Act shall be transferred each year upon the approval of the Director of Finance, for expenditure as necessary for the department to provide technical assistance to community-based organizations and nonprofit agencies providing services under this chapter. Nothing in this chapter precludes the department from providing technical assistance services through an independent agency or organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 842, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Gang Violence Suppression [13826. - 13826.7.]

13826.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) That violent activity by gangs is a serious and growing problem in the State of California.

(b) There is an increasing percentage of school age pupils involved in gang activity.

(c) There are many schools that serve a disproportionate number of youth involved in gang activity which are unable to effectively implement programs designed to prevent youth from becoming involved in gang activity. There is no statewide funded educational program developed for this purpose.

(d) There is evidence that gang involvement among youth begins at an early age.

(e) There is evidence that the parents of gang members lack appropriate parenting skills.

(f) There is evidence that drug activity is increasing among youth involved in gang activity.

(g) There is evidence that gang members have no contact with positive role models.

(h) There is evidence that most gang members lack basic educational skills.

In enacting this chapter, the Legislature intends to support increased efforts by district attorneys’ offices to prosecute the perpetrators of gang violence, support increased efforts by local law enforcement agencies to identify, investigate, and apprehend perpetrators of gang violence, support increased efforts by county probation departments to intensively supervise gang members who are on court-ordered probation, support gang violence prevention and intervention efforts by school districts and county offices of education, and support gang violence suppression efforts by community-based organizations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 929, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13826.1.

(a) There is hereby established in the Board of State and Community Corrections, the Gang Violence Suppression Program, a program of financial and technical assistance for district attorneys’ offices, local law enforcement agencies, county probation departments, school districts, county offices of education, or any consortium thereof, and community-based organizations which are primarily engaged in the suppression of gang violence.

(b) Funds made available pursuant to this chapter are intended to ensure the highest quality provision of services and to reduce unnecessary duplication. Funds disbursed under this chapter shall not be used by local agencies to supplant other funding for Public Safety Services, as defined in Section 36 of Article XIII of the California
 Constitution. Funds awarded under this program as local assistance grants shall not be subject to review as specified in Section 10295 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 26, Sec. 37.   (AB 1468)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

13826.11.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares the following:

(1) There is a greater threat to public safety resulting from gang- and drug-related activity in and near California’s inner cities.

(2) Young people, especially at-promise youth, are more vulnerable to gang- and drug-related activity during the potentially unsupervised hours between the end of school and the time their parents or guardians return home from work.

(3) Without local prevention and treatment efforts, hard drugs will continue to threaten and destroy
 families and communities in and near the inner cities. Drug-related violence may then escalate dramatically in every community, and thereby burden the criminal justice system to the point that it cannot function effectively.

(4) Los Angeles currently leads the nation in the number of gang members and gang sites, the consumption of drugs, the amount of drugs confiscated, drug-related violent crimes, and has the greatest number of young people between 6 and 18 years of age who are “at risk.”

(5) It is the intent of the Legislature that a pilot program, the “After School Alternative Program” (ASAP), be established and implemented within a specified Los Angeles community. This community program would utilize the public schools, businesses, and community facilities to provide
 supportive programs and activities to young people during the time between the end of school and the return home of their parents or guardians (from approximately 3 p.m. to 7 p.m.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 800, Sec. 22.   (AB 413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13826.15.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the implementation of the Gang Violence Suppression Program, as provided in this chapter, has made a positive impact in the battle against crimes committed by gang members in California.

 (b) The Legislature further finds and declares that the program, when it was originally created in 1981, provided financial and technical assistance only for district attorneys’ offices. Since that time, however, the provisions of the program have been amended by the Legislature to enable additional public entities and community-based organizations to participate in the program.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 36, Sec. 63) by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 68.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Amended version operative July 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2011, Ch. 136, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

13826.2.

Gang violence prosecution units receiving funds under this chapter are encouraged to concentrate enhanced prosecution efforts and resources upon cases identified under the suggested criteria set forth in Section 13826.3. Enhanced prosecution efforts may include, but not be limited to:

(a) “Vertical” prosecutorial representation, whereby the prosecutor who makes the initial filing or appearance in a gang-related case will perform all subsequent court appearances on that particular case through its conclusion, including the sentencing phase.

(b) Assignment of highly qualified investigators and prosecutors to gang-related cases.

(c) Significant reduction of caseloads for investigators and prosecutors assigned to gang-related cases.

(d) Measures taken in coordination with law enforcement agencies to protect cooperating witnesses from intimidation or retribution at the hands of gang members or associates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 69.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

13826.3.

(a) An individual is subject to gang violence prosecution efforts if he or she is under arrest for the commission or the attempted commission of any gang-related violent crime where the individual is (1) a known member of a gang, and (2) has exhibited a prior criminal background.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “gang-related” means that the suspect or victim of the crime is a known member of a gang.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, gang violence prosecution includes both criminal prosecutions and proceedings in Juvenile Court in which a petition is filed pursuant to Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 70.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

13826.4.

Law enforcement agencies receiving funds under this chapter are encouraged to concentrate enhanced law enforcement efforts and resources upon cases identified under criteria set forth in Section 13826.3. Enhanced law enforcement criteria efforts may include, but not be limited to:

(a) The formation of a specialized gang violence unit whose staff shall be composed of the most highly qualified and trained personnel.

(b) The efforts of the gang violence unit may include, but not be limited to:

(1) Increased efforts to apprehend, prosecute, and convict violent “hard core” target
 gang members.

(2) Increasing the clearance rate of reported crimes which are targeted as gang related.

(3) Establishing more positive relations with, and encouraging the support of local citizens, community-based organizations, business representatives, and other criminal agencies.

(4) Aiding and assisting other criminal justice and governmental agencies in protecting cooperating witnesses from intimidation or retribution at the hands of gang members and their associates.

(c) Law enforcement agencies receiving funds under this program shall maintain a crime analysis capability which provides the following type of information:

(1) Identification of active gang members who have exhibited a
 prior criminal background.

(2) Identification of evolving or existing crime patterns that are gang related.

(3) Providing investigative leads.

(4) Maintaining statistical information pertaining to gang related criminal activity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 71.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

13826.5.

County probation departments receiving funding under this chapter shall strictly enforce court-ordered conditions of probation for gang members.

(a) County probation departments supported under the Gang Violence Suppression Program may implement the following activities:

(1) A Gang Violence Intensive Supervision Unit dealing with gang members may be established.

(2) Criteria used to determine which probationer may be assigned to the Gang Violence Intensive Supervision Unit may be approved by the district attorney having a Gang Violence Prosecution Unit described in Section
 13826.2.

(3) County probation departments are encouraged to inform probationers whose cases are assigned to the intensive supervision unit of what types of behavior are prescribed or forbidden. The counties are encouraged to provide notice in both oral and written form.

(4) County probation departments are encouraged to inform probationers whose cases are assigned to the intensive supervision unit, in writing, that all court-ordered conditions of probation will be strictly enforced.

(5) County probation departments are encouraged to ensure that deputy probation officers in the intensive supervision unit have reduced probationer caseloads and coordinate their supervision efforts with law enforcement and prosecution personnel. The coordination is encouraged to include informing law enforcement and prosecution personnel
 of the conditions set for probationers and of the strict enforcement procedures to be implemented.

(6) Deputy probation officers in the intensive supervision unit are encouraged to coordinate with the district attorney in ensuring that court-ordered conditions of probation are consistently enforced.

(7) Intensive supervision unit deputy probation officers are encouraged to coordinate, whenever feasible, with community-based organizations in seeking to ensure that probationers adhere to their court-ordered conditions.

(b) County probation departments may implement the California TEAM (Together Each Achieves More) Sports Camp Program, as described in Article 23.5 (commencing with Section 875) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 72.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

13826.6.

For purposes of this chapter, a “community-based” organization is defined as a nonprofit operation established to serve gang members, their families, schools, and the community with programs of community supervision and service that maintain community participation in the planning, operation, and evaluation of their programs.

“Community-based” organization also includes public park and recreation agencies, public libraries, and public community services departments that provide gang suppression activities, either alone or in cooperation with other public agencies or other community-based organizations.

(a) Unless funded pursuant to subdivision (c),
 community-based organizations supported under the Gang Violence Suppression Program may implement the following activities:

(1) Providing information to law enforcement agencies concerning gang related activities in the community.

(2) Providing information to school administrators and staff concerning gang related activities in the community.

(3) Providing conflict resolution by means of intervention or mediation to prevent and limit gang crisis situations.

(4) Increasing witness cooperation through coordination with local law enforcement and prosecutors and by education of the community about the roles of these government agencies and the availability of witness protection services.

(b) Community-based organizations funded pursuant to subdivision (a) may also implement the following activities:

(1) Maintaining a 24-hour public telephone message center for the receipt of information and to assist individuals seeking services from the organization.

(2) Maintaining a “rumor control” public telephone service to provide accurate and reliable information to concerned citizens.

(3) Providing technical assistance and training concerning gang related activities to school staff members, law enforcement personnel, and community members, including parental groups. This training and assistance may include coverage of how to prevent and minimize intergang confrontations.

(4) Providing recreational activities for gang members or
 potential gang members.

(5) Providing job training and placement services for youth.

(6) Referring gang members, as needed, to appropriate agencies for the treatment of health, psychological, and drug-related problems.

(7) Administration of the Urban Corps Program pursuant to Section 13826.62.

(8) Mobilizing the community to share joint responsibility with local criminal justice personnel to prevent and suppress gang violence.

(c) Community-based organizations funded under the Gang Violence Suppression Program for specialized school prevention and intervention activities shall only be required to implement activities in the schools which are designed to discourage students from joining
 gangs and which offer or encourage students to participate in alternative programs.

(d) Community-based organizations funded pursuant to the Gang Violence Suppression Program as of January 1, 1997, shall receive preference over public agencies in any future funding awards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 73.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

13826.62.

(a) There is hereby established in the Office of Emergency Services the Urban Corps Program. The Urban Corps Program is established as an optional activity under Section 13826.6. Community-based organizations receiving grants to participate in the Urban Corps Program may implement the following activities:

(1) Identification of publicly and privately administered programs in the county dealing with the suppression or prevention of criminal gang activities, or both.

(2) Maintenance of a listing of programs within the county identified as dealing with the suppression or prevention of criminal gang activities, or
 both.

(3) Surveying gang suppression and prevention organizations for the types of services and activities each is engaged in, and identifying needs among these organizations for resources to provide services and fulfill their activities.

(4) Recruitment of volunteers, identification of their skills, abilities, and interests, and matching volunteers with the resource needs of gang prevention and suppression organizations.

(5) Establishment of an urban respite program for the purpose of preventing self-destructive activities and diverting (A) identified youth gang members, and (B) youths who are at risk of becoming gang members, for the purposes of reducing or eliminating incentives for those youths to participate in
 gang-related crime activities.

(b) The Urban Corps Program shall operate within the Office of Emergency Services for two years following the establishment of a contract with a community-based organization to administer the program.

(c) This section shall be implemented to the extent that funds are available to the Office of Emergency Services for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 442.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13826.65.

School districts, county offices of education, or any consortium thereof, receiving funding under this chapter shall develop or adopt and implement a gang violence prevention curriculum, provide gang violence prevention and intervention services for school-aged children, and shall be encouraged to do all of the following:

(a) Establish a local steering committee comprised of representatives of each local program funded under this chapter, corporations, small businesses, and other appropriate local, county, and community organization knowledgeable in the area of youth gang violence.

(b) Develop and distribute information concerning parent education and parenting classes, including methods whereby parents may recognize youth gang involvement.

(c) Identify and utilize the resources of appropriate community-based organizations involved in the coordination of after school activities for school-aged youth.

(d) Establish contact between positive role models and youth involved in gang activity through adopt-a-youth programs and similar programs.

(e) Incorporate into gang prevention activities references to the relationship between drug abuse and gang violence.

(f) Develop partnerships between schools and businesses for the purpose of enhancing pupil achievement through such methods as tutorial services, field trips, role modeling, and other supportive services.

(g) Develop methods of assuring followup services for children receiving the initial gang violence prevention and intervention services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 929, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

13826.7.

The Board of State and Community Corrections is encouraged to utilize any federal funds that may become available for purposes of this chapter. This chapter becomes operative only if federal funds are made available for its implementation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 36, Sec. 64.   (SB 92)   Effective June 30, 2011.   Amendment operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 36, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 136, Sec. 32.   Note: This section makes conditional the operation of Chapter 3.5, commencing with Section 13826.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.6. Office of Gang and Youth Violence Policy [13827. - 13827.]

13827.

(a) The Office of Gang and Youth Violence Policy is hereby abolished. The duties and obligations of that office, and all powers and authority formerly exercised by that office, shall be transferred to and assumed by the Board of State and Community Corrections.

(b) Except for this section, the phrase “Office of Gang and Youth Violence Policy” or any reference to that phrase in this code shall be construed to mean the board. Any reference to the executive director of the Office of Gang and Youth Violence Policy in this code shall be construed to mean the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 41, Sec. 85.   (SB 1021)   Effective June 27, 2012)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.7. Judicial Training Programs for Child Sexual Abuse Cases [13828. - 13828.1.]

13828.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that there is a need to develop and provide training programs regarding the handling of judicial proceedings involving the victims of child sexual abuse. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to provide training programs which will ensure that children who are the victims of sexual abuse shall be treated with special consideration during all proceedings related to allegations of child sexual abuse, including all trials and administrative hearings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13828.1.

From funds appropriated for those purposes, the Judicial Council shall establish and maintain an ongoing program to provide training for the judicial branch of government relating to the handling of child sexual abuse cases.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Criminal Justice Planning Committee for State Judicial System [13830. - 13839.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [13830. - 13833.]

13830.

There is hereby created in state government a Judicial Criminal Justice Planning Committee of seven members. The Judicial Council shall appoint the members of the committee who shall hold office at its pleasure. In this respect the Legislature finds as follows:

(a) The California court system has a constitutionally established independence under the judicial and separation of power clauses of the State Constitution.

(b) The California court system has a statewide structure created under the Constitution, state statutes, and state court rules, and the Judicial Council of California is the constitutionally established state agency having
 responsibility for the operation of that structure.

(c) The California court system will be directly affected by the criminal justice planning that will be done under this title and by the federal grants that will be made to implement that planning.

(d) For effective planning and implementation of court projects it is essential that the Office of Emergency Services have the advice and assistance of a state judicial system planning committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 443.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13833.

The expenses necessarily incurred by the members of the Judicial Criminal Justice Planning Committee in the performance of their duties under this title shall be paid by the Judicial Council, but it shall be reimbursed by the Office of Emergency Services to the extent that federal funds can be made available for that purpose. Staff support for the committee’s activities shall be provided by the Judicial Council, but the cost of that staff support shall be reimbursed by the Office of Emergency Services to the extent that federal funds can be made available for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 444.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Local Assistance Centers for Victims and Witnesses [13835. - 13835.10.]

13835.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) That there is a need to develop methods to reduce the trauma and insensitive treatment that victims and witnesses may experience in the wake of a crime, since all too often citizens who become involved with the criminal justice system, either as victims or witnesses to crime, are further victimized by that system.

(b) That when a crime is committed, the chief concern of criminal justice agencies has been apprehending and dealing with the criminal, and that after police leave the scene of the crime, the victim is frequently forgotten.

(c) That victims often become isolated and receive little practical advice or necessary care.

(d) That witnesses must make arrangements to appear in court regardless of their own schedules, child care responsibilities, or transportation problems, and that they often find long waits, crowded courthouse hallways, confusing circumstances and, after testifying, receive no information as to the disposition of the case.

(e) That a large number of victims and witnesses are unaware of both their rights and obligations.

(f) That although the State of California has a fund for needy victims of violent crimes, and compensation is available for medical expenses, lost income or wages, and rehabilitation costs, the application process may be difficult, complex, and time-consuming, and victims may not be aware that the compensation provisions exist.

It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature to provide services to meet the needs of both victims and witnesses of crime through the funding of local comprehensive centers for victim and witness assistance.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1312, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13835.2.

(a) Funds appropriated from the Victim-Witness Assistance Fund shall be made available through the Office of Emergency Services to any public or private nonprofit agency for the assistance of victims and witnesses that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) It provides comprehensive services to victims and witnesses of all types of crime. It is the intent of the Legislature to make funds available only to programs that do not restrict services to victims and witnesses of a particular type of crime, and do not restrict services to victims of crime in which there is a suspect in the case.

(2) It is recognized by the board of supervisors as the major
 provider of comprehensive services to victims and witnesses in the county.

(3) It is selected by the board of supervisors as the agency to receive funds pursuant to this article.

(4) It assists victims of crime in the preparation, verification, and presentation of their claims to the California Victim Compensation Board for indemnification pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 13959) of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(5) It cooperates with the California Victim Compensation Board in verifying the data required by Article 1 (commencing with Section 13959) of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The Office of Emergency Services shall consider the following factors, together with any other
 circumstances it deems appropriate, in awarding funds to public or private nonprofit agencies designated as victim and witness assistance centers:

(1) The capability of the agency to provide comprehensive services as defined in this article.

(2) The stated goals and objectives of the center.

(3) The number of people to be served and the needs of the community.

(4) Evidence of community support.

(5) The organizational structure of the agency that will operate the center.

(6) The capability of the agency to provide confidentiality of records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 258.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13835.4.
